Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-484.06
Operators' licenses; state identification cards; department; power to verify documents.

Before issuing any operator's license or state identification card under the Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act, the department may verify, with the issuing agency, the issuance, validity, and completeness of each document required to be presented by a person pursuant to sections 60-484, 60-484.04, 60-484.07, and 60-4,144.

Laws 2011, LB215, § 9;

Laws 2014, LB983, § 14;

Laws 2023, LB138, § 19.